Montana, session 2025, LC1373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Structures or interruptions in stream -- fees -- bonding. (1) A person
responsible for a structure or other constructed interruption or modification in a stream shall:
(a) remove the structure or other constructed interruption or modification within 1 year after
ceasing use of that structure or interruption; or
(b) pay a filing fee of $5,000 to the department and file a surety bond with the department for an
amount sufficient to enable the department to remove the structure or constructed interruption or modification
and restore the stream.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "stream" means a natural, perennial-flowing stream or river, its
bed, and its immediate banks.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 77, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 77, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****